Illinois, session 104th, SB3637.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-54 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-54 new)7    Sec. 5-54. Coverage for proteomic blood tests.8    (a) The medical assistance program shall provide coverage 9and reimbursement for a prescribed proteomic blood test to 10identify and manage the risk of spontaneous preterm birth in 11pregnant persons. 12    (b) The test results shall be used to assign care 13management services and other appropriate interventions to 14manage risk, prolong pregnancy, and improve outcomes.